South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3516.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-3-212(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) A person who newly acquires a vehicle or an owner of a vehicle registered in a foreign jurisdiction that is being moved into this State, that is required to be registered under this title, and that is not properly registered and licensed, before operating the vehicle on the state's highways during the forty-five-day period contained in this section, must: (1) transfer a license plate from another vehicle pursuant to Section 56-3-1290; (2) purchase a new license plate and registration; (3) purchase a temporary license plate from the department; or (4) purchase a temporary license plate from the county auditor's office in the county in which the person resides.; or (5) maintain in the vehicle at all times proof of insurance and the bill of sale to verify the vehicle's date of purchase to a law enforcement officer. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----